Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1.1. Stormwater Management.

§§ 10.1-603.1 through 10.1-603.8:1.
Repealed by Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 2, effective July 2, 2013.

Cross references.

For current provisions related to Stormwater Management program, see Article 2.3 (§ 62.1-44.15:24 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, recodified Article 1.1 (§

10.1-603.1

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 10.1, as Article 2.3 (§ 62.1-44.15:24 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1. In addition to revision by Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, Article 1.1 was also amended by other acts passed at the 2013 Session. As required by § 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated the majority of these amendments into the new sections. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

§ 10.1-603.9.
Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 785 and 819, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-603.9

, permit application required for issuance of grading, building, or other permits, derived from Acts 1989, cc. 467, 499; 2004, c. 372.

§§ 10.1-603.10 through 10.1-603.15.

Repealed by Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 2, effective July 2, 2013.

Cross references.

For provisions related to Stormwater Management program, see Article 2.3 (§ 62.1-44.15:24 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, recodified Article 1.1 (§

10.1-603.1

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 10.1, as Article 2.3 (§ 62.1-44.15:24 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1. In addition to revision by Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, Article 1.1 was also amended by other acts passed at the 2013 Session. As required by § 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated the majority of these amendments into the new sections. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.